Wisconsin, session 2025, SB194.
do enact as follows:SB194,11Section 1. 19.37 (2) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 19.37 (2) (a) 1.SB194,22Section 2. 19.37 (2) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB194,2,5319.37 (2) (a) 2. A requester has prevailed in whole or in substantial part under 4this paragraph if the requester has obtained relief through any of the following 5means:SB194,2,66a. A judicial order or an enforceable written agreement or consent decree.SB194,2,97b. The authority’s voluntary or unilateral release of a record if the court 8determines that the filing of the action under sub. (1) was a substantial factor 9contributing to that voluntary or unilateral release.SB194,2,1010